Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,110.03
State Surveyor; ex officio secretary of examining board.

The State Surveyor shall be ex officio secretary of the examining board and of all committees appointed by the examining board.

Laws 1971, LB 442, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 874, § 5.

For provisions for appointment of the State Surveyor, see section 84-407.